src/orthography/spellrelax-with-tags.xfscript
! Tags to be appended to an fst to get spell-relax tags:
define spellrelax [
 á (->) a "aaX" || _ ?* "^a2A" ,,
 é (->) e "eeX" || _ ?* "^e2E" ,,
 ä (->) a "aeX" || _ ?* "^a2ae" ,,
 ú (->) u "uuX" || _ ?* "^u2U" ,,
 g̲ (->) g  "ggX" || _ ?* "^g2G" ,,
 k̲ (->) k  "kkX" || _ ?* "^k2K" ,,
 x̲ (->) x  "xxX" || _ ?* "^x2X" ];

define Restr1 "^a2A" => "aaX" ?* _ ;
define Restr2 "^e2E" => "eeX" ?* _ ;
define Restr3 "^a2ae" => "aeX" ?* _ ;
define Restr4 "^u2U" => "uuX" ?* _ ;
define Restr5 "^g2G" =>  "ggX" ?* _ ;
define Restr6 "^k2K" =>  "kkX" ?* _ ;
define Restr7 "^x2X" =>  "xxX" ?* _ ;

define Clean "aaX" -> 0,
             "eeX" -> 0,
             "aeX" -> 0,
             "uuX" -> 0,
             "ggX" -> 0,
             "kkX" -> 0,
             "xxX" -> 0,
             "aaX" -> 0,
             "eeX" -> 0,
             "aeX" -> 0,
             "uuX" -> 0,
             "ggX" -> 0,
             "kkX" -> 0,
             "xxX" -> 0;

read regex spellrelax .o.
           Restr1     .o.
           Restr2     .o.
           Restr3     .o.
           Restr4     .o.
           Restr5     .o.
           Restr6     .o.
           Restr7     .o.
           Clean ;
